New York, session 2025-2026, A9658.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 503 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (v) to read 3 as follows: 4 (v) The renewal fee for a license for any United States veteran shall 5 be waived. The term veteran shall mean a person, of any gender, who has 6 served in the active military or naval service of the United States 7 during a war in which the United States engaged, and who has been 8 released from such service otherwise than by dishonorable discharge, or 9 who has been furloughed to the reserve. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06904-01-5